FST-based/with-dict/oss_proto.foma
### oss_proto.foma ###

define V [ а | е | ё | и | о | у | ы | э | ю | я | ӕ ] ; 
define C [ б | в | г | д | ж | з | й | к | л | м | н | п | р | с | т | ф | х | ц | ч | ш | щ | ъ | ь ] ;

define YInsertion [..] -> ы || C _ "$" т ;

define JInsertion [..] -> й || V "$" _ V ;

define ExAbl й -> 0 || V "$" й ӕ _ ;

define NCleanup "$" -> 0 ;

define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

### 1 Sg
define 1SgNom [ [ {ӕз} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Sing+Case=Nom" .x. {ӕз} ] ] ;
define 1SgGen [ [ {ӕз} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Sing+Case=Gen" .x. {мӕн} ] | [ {ӕз} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Sing+Case=Gen" .x. {мӕ} ] ] ;
define 1SgDat [ [ {ӕз} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Sing+Case=Dat" .x. {мӕнӕн} ] | [ {ӕз} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Sing+Case=Dat" .x. {мын} ] ] ;
define 1SgAll [ [ {ӕз} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Sing+Case=All" .x. {мӕнмӕ} ] | [ {ӕз} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Sing+Case=All" .x. {мӕм} ] ] ;
define 1SgAbl [ [ {ӕз} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Sing+Case=Abl" .x. {мӕнӕй} ] | [ {ӕз} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Sing+Case=Abl" .x. {мӕ} ] ] ;
define 1SgIne [ [ {ӕз} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Sing+Case=Ine" .x. {мӕ} ] ] ;
define 1SgSup [ [ {ӕз} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Sing+Case=Sup" .x. {мӕныл} ] | [ {ӕз} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Sing+Case=Sup" .x. {мыл} ] ] ;
define 1SgEqu [ [ {ӕз} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Sing+Case=Equ" .x. {мӕнау} ] ] ;
define 1SgCom [ [ {ӕз} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Sing+Case=Com" .x. {мӕнимӕ} ] | [ {мӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Sing+Case=Com" .x. {мемӕ} ] ] ;
define 1SgReflNom [ [ {мӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Sing+Reflex=Yes+Case=Nom" .x. {мӕхӕдӕг} ] | [ {мӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Sing+Reflex=Yes+Case=Nom" .x. {мӕхуыддӕг} ] ] ;
define 1SgReflGen [ [ {мӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Sing+Reflex=Yes+Case=Gen" .x. {мӕхи} ] ] ;
define 1SgReflDat [ [ {мӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Sing+Reflex=Yes+Case=Dat" .x. {мӕхицӕн} ] ] ;
define 1SgReflAll [ [ {мӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Sing+Reflex=Yes+Case=All" .x. {мӕхимӕ} ] ] ;
define 1SgReflAbl [ [ {мӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Sing+Reflex=Yes+Case=Abl" .x. {мӕхицӕй} ] ] ;
define 1SgReflIne [ [ {мӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Sing+Reflex=Yes+Case=Ine" .x. {мӕхи} ] ] ;
define 1SgReflSup [ [ {мӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Sing+Reflex=Yes+Case=Sup" .x. {мӕхиуыл} ] ] ;
define 1SgReflEqu [ [ {мӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Sing+Reflex=Yes+Case=Equ" .x. {мӕхийау} ] ] ;
define 1SgReflCom [ [ {мӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Sing+Reflex=Yes+Case=Com" .x. {мӕхиимӕ} ] ] ;
define 1Sg [ 1SgNom | 1SgGen | 1SgDat | 1SgAll | 1SgAbl | 1SgIne | 1SgSup | 1SgEqu | 1SgCom | 1SgReflNom | 1SgReflGen | 1SgReflDat | 1SgReflAll | 1SgReflAbl | 1SgReflIne | 1SgReflSup | 1SgReflEqu | 1SgReflCom ] ;

### 2 Sg
define 2SgNom [ [ {ды} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=2" "+Number=Sing+Case=Nom" .x. {ды} ] ] ;
define 2SgGen [ [ {ды} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=2" "+Number=Sing+Case=Gen" .x. {дӕу} ] | [ {ды} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=2" "+Number=Sing+Case=Gen" .x. {дӕ} ] ] ;
define 2SgDat [ [ {ды} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=2" "+Number=Sing+Case=Dat" .x. {дӕуӕн} ] | [ {ды} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=2" "+Number=Sing+Case=Dat" .x. {дын} ] ] ;
define 2SgAll [ [ {ды} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=2" "+Number=Sing+Case=All" .x. {дӕумӕ} ] | [ {ды} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=2" "+Number=Sing+Case=All" .x. {дӕм} ] ] ;
define 2SgAbl [ [ {ды} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=2" "+Number=Sing+Case=Abl" .x. {дӕуӕй} ] | [ {ды} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=2" "+Number=Sing+Case=Abl" .x. {дӕ} ] ] ;
define 2SgIne [ [ {ды} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=2" "+Number=Sing+Case=Ine" .x. {дӕ} ] ] ;
define 2SgSup [ [ {ды} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=2" "+Number=Sing+Case=Sup" .x. {дӕуыл} ] | [ {ды} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=2" "+Number=Sing+Case=Sup" .x. {дыл} ] ] ;
define 2SgEqu [ [ {ды} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=2" "+Number=Sing+Case=Equ" .x. {дӕуау} ] ] ;
define 2SgCom [ [ {ды} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=2" "+Number=Sing+Case=Com" .x. {дӕуимӕ} ] | [ {ды} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=2" "+Number=Sing+Case=Com" .x. {демӕ} ] ] ;
define 2SgReflNom [ [ {дӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=2" "+Number=Sing+Reflex=Yes+Case=Nom" .x. {дӕхӕдӕг} ] | [ {дӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=2" "+Number=Sing+Reflex=Yes+Case=Nom" .x. {дӕхуыддӕг} ] ] ;
define 2SgReflGen [ [ {дӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=2" "+Number=Sing+Reflex=Yes+Case=Gen" .x. {дӕхи} ] ] ;
define 2SgReflDat [ [ {дӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=2" "+Number=Sing+Reflex=Yes+Case=Dat" .x. {дӕхицӕн} ] ] ;
define 2SgReflAll [ [ {дӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=2" "+Number=Sing+Reflex=Yes+Case=All" .x. {дӕхимӕ} ] ] ;
define 2SgReflAbl [ [ {дӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=2" "+Number=Sing+Reflex=Yes+Case=Abl" .x. {дӕхицӕй} ] ] ;
define 2SgReflIne [ [ {дӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=2" "+Number=Sing+Reflex=Yes+Case=Ine" .x. {дӕхи} ] ] ;
define 2SgReflSup [ [ {дӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=2" "+Number=Sing+Reflex=Yes+Case=Sup" .x. {дӕхиуыл} ] ] ;
define 2SgReflEqu [ [ {дӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=2" "+Number=Sing+Reflex=Yes+Case=Equ" .x. {дӕхийау} ] ] ;
define 2SgReflCom [ [ {дӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=2" "+Number=Sing+Reflex=Yes+Case=Com" .x. {дӕхиимӕ} ] ] ;
define 2Sg [ 2SgNom | 2SgGen | 2SgDat | 2SgAll | 2SgAbl | 2SgIne | 2SgSup | 2SgEqu | 2SgCom | 2SgReflNom | 2SgReflGen | 2SgReflDat | 2SgReflAll | 2SgReflAbl | 2SgReflIne | 2SgReflSup | 2SgReflEqu | 2SgReflCom ] ;

### 3 Sg
define 3SgGen [ [ {уый} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=3" "+Number=Sing+Case=Gen" .x. {ӕй} ] | [ {уый} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=3" "+Number=Sing+Case=Gen" .x. {йӕ} ] ] ;
define 3SgDat [ [ {уый} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=3" "+Number=Sing+Case=Dat" .x. {ын} ] | [ {уый} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=3" "+Number=Sing+Case=Dat" .x. {йын} ] ] ;
define 3SgAll [ [ {уый} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=3" "+Number=Sing+Case=All" .x. {ӕм} ] | [ {уый} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=3" "+Number=Sing+Case=All" .x. {йӕм} ] ] ;
define 3SgIne [ [ {уый} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=3" "+Number=Sing+Case=Ine" .x. {ӕй} ] | [ {уый} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=3" "+Number=Sing+Case=Ine" .x. {йӕ} ] | [ {уый} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=3" "+Number=Sing+Case=Ine" .x. {дзы} ] ] ;
define 3SgAbl [ [ {уый} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=3" "+Number=Sing+Case=Abl" .x. {ӕй} ] | [ {уый} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=3" "+Number=Sing+Case=Abl" .x. {йӕ} ] | [ {уый} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=3" "+Number=Sing+Case=Abl" .x. {дзы} ] ] ;
define 3SgSup [ [ {уый} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=3" "+Number=Sing+Case=Sup" .x. {ыл} ] | [ {уый} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=3" "+Number=Sing+Case=Sup" .x. {йыл} ] ] ;
define 3SgCom [ [ {уый} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=3" "+Number=Sing+Case=Com" .x. {йемӕ} ] ] ;
define 3SgReflNom [ [ {йӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=3" "+Number=Sing+Reflex=Yes+Case=Nom" .x. {йӕхӕдӕг} ] | [ {йӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=3" "+Number=Sing+Reflex=Yes+Case=Nom" .x. {йӕхуыддӕг} ] ] ;
define 3SgReflGen [ [ {йӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=3" "+Number=Sing+Reflex=Yes+Case=Gen" .x. {йӕхи} ] ] ;
define 3SgReflDat [ [ {йӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=3" "+Number=Sing+Reflex=Yes+Case=Dat" .x. {йӕхицӕн} ] ] ;
define 3SgReflAll [ [ {йӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=3" "+Number=Sing+Reflex=Yes+Case=All" .x. {йӕхимӕ} ] ] ;
define 3SgReflIne [ [ {йӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=3" "+Number=Sing+Reflex=Yes+Case=Ine" .x. {йӕхи} ] ] ;
define 3SgReflAbl [ [ {йӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=3" "+Number=Sing+Reflex=Yes+Case=Abl" .x. {йӕхицӕй} ] ] ;
define 3SgReflSup [ [ {йӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=3" "+Number=Sing+Reflex=Yes+Case=Sup" .x. {йӕхиуыл} ] ] ;
define 3SgReflEqu [ [ {йӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=3" "+Number=Sing+Reflex=Yes+Case=Equ" .x. {йӕхийау} ] ] ;
define 3SgReflCom [ [ {йӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=3" "+Number=Sing+Reflex=Yes+Case=Com" .x. {йӕхиимӕ} ] ] ;
define 3Sg [ 3SgNom | 3SgGen | 3SgDat | 3SgAll | 3SgAbl | 3SgIne | 3SgSup | 3SgEqu | 3SgCom | 3SgReflNom | 3SgReflGen | 3SgReflDat | 3SgReflAll | 3SgReflAbl | 3SgReflIne | 3SgReflSup | 3SgReflEqu | 3SgReflCom ] ;

### 1 Pl
define 1PlNom [ [ {мах} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Plur+Case=Nom" .x. {мах} ] ] ;
define 1PlGen [ [ {мах} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Plur+Case=Gen" .x. {мах} ] | [ {мах} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Plur+Case=Gen" .x. {нӕ} ] ] ;
define 1PlDat [ [ {мах} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Plur+Case=Dat" .x. {махӕн} ] | [ {мах} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Plur+Case=Dat" .x. {нын} ] ] ;
define 1PlAll [ [ {мах} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Plur+Case=All" .x. {махмӕ} ] | [ {мах} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Plur+Case=All" .x. {нӕм} ] ] ;
define 1PlIne [ [ {мах} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Plur+Case=Ine" .x. {нӕ} ] ] ;
define 1PlAbl [ [ {мах} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Plur+Case=Abl" .x. {махӕй} ] | [ {мах} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Plur+Case=Abl" .x. {нӕ} ] ] ;
define 1PlSup [ [ {мах} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Plur+Case=Sup" .x. {махыл} ] | [ {мах} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Plur+Case=Sup" .x. {ныл} ] ] ;
define 1PlEqu [ [ {мах} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Plur+Case=Equ" .x. {махау} ] ] ;
define 1PlCom [ [ {мах} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Plur+Case=Com" .x. {махимӕ} ] | [ {мах} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Plur+Case=Com" .x. {немӕ} ] ] ;
define 1PlReflNom [ [ {нӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Plur+Reflex=Yes+Case=Nom" .x. {нӕхӕдӕг} ] | [ {нӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Plur+Reflex=Yes+Case=Nom" .x. {нӕхуыддӕг} ] ] ;
define 1PlReflGen [ [ {нӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Plur+Reflex=Yes+Case=Gen" .x. {нӕхи} ] ] ;
define 1PlReflDat [ [ {нӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Plur+Reflex=Yes+Case=Dat" .x. {нӕхицӕн} ] ] ;
define 1PlReflAll [ [ {нӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Plur+Reflex=Yes+Case=All" .x. {нӕхимӕ} ] ] ;
define 1PlReflIne [ [ {нӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Plur+Reflex=Yes+Case=Ine" .x. {нӕхи} ] ] ;
define 1PlReflAbl [ [ {нӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Plur+Reflex=Yes+Case=Abl" .x. {нӕхицӕй} ] ] ;
define 1PlReflSup [ [ {нӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Plur+Reflex=Yes+Case=Sup" .x. {нӕхиуыл} ] ] ;
define 1PlReflEqu [ [ {нӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Plur+Reflex=Yes+Case=Equ" .x. {нӕхийау} ] ] ;
define 1PlReflCom [ [ {нӕхӕдӕг} "+PRON+PronType=Prs+Person=1" "+Number=Plur+Reflex=Yes+Case=Com" .x. {нӕхиимӕ} ] ] ;
define 1Pl [ 1PlNom | 1PlGen | 1PlDat | 1PlAll | 1PlAbl | 1PlIne | 1PlSup | 1PlEqu | 1PlCom | 1PlReflNom | 1PlReflGen | 1PlReflDat | 1PlReflAll | 1PlReflAbl | 1PlReflIne | 1PlReflSup | 1PlReflEqu | 1PlReflCom ] ;
